District of Columbia statutes.
19-1302.01

Role of court in administration of trust.

(a)

The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

(b)

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

(c)

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust’s administration, including a request for instructions and an action to declare rights.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 201 of the Uniform Trust Code.